public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A erŧitar arŧitaròmi/K erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitase/I erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitasi erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitasta/I erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitaste/I erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitasti/I erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitasto/I erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitava/JLPR erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitave/JL erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitavi/NP erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitavo/JL erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitede erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitege erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitemo/L erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧiten/L erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitendo/E erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitene erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧiteni/M erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitense erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitese/I erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitesi erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitesta/I erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧiteste/I erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitesti/I erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitesto/I erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧiteva/JLPR erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧiteve/JL erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitevi/NP erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitevo/JL erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧition/L erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitione erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitioni/M erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitionse erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitisen/L erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitisene erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitiseni/M erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitisense erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitision/L erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitisione erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitisioni/M erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitisionse erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitisié/P erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitisiéde/P erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitisiége/P erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitison/L erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitisone erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitisoni/M erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitisonse erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitiven/L erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitiveni/M erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitivense erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitivion/L erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitivioni/M erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitivionse erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitivié/P erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitiviéu/Q erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitivon/L erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitivoni/M erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitivonse erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitié/P erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitiéde/P erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitiége/P erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitiéu/Q erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧiton/L erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitone erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitoni/M erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitonse erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧità/ erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàa/JLPR erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàami/K erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàau/Q erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàe/JL erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàelo/S erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàemi/K erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitài/NP erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàimo/L erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàimoi/M erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàitu/O erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàndome/G erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàndomene/G erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitào/JL erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàomi/K erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàrmene/G erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàsimo erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàvami/K erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàvau/Q erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàvelo/S erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàvemi/K erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàvimo/L erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàvimoi/M erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàvitu/O erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitàvomi/K erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitè/FP erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitème/H erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitèu/Q erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧité/FP erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitéa/JLPR erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitéami/K erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitéau/Q erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitée/JL erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitéelo/S erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitéemi/K erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitéi/NP erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitéimo/L erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitéimoi/M erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitéitu/O erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitémoi/M erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧiténdome/G erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧiténdomene/G erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitéo/JL erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitéomi/K erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitésimo erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitéu/Q erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitévami/K erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitévau/Q erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitévelo/S erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitévemi/K erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitévimo/L erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitévimoi/M erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitévitu/O erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar arŧitévomi/K erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar èrŧita/FR erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar èrŧite/IJLR erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar èrŧitelo/S erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar èrŧiteme/H erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar èrŧitemi/K erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar èrŧiti/N erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar èrŧititu/O erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar èrŧito/JL erŧitar
SFX A erŧitar èrŧitomi/K erŧitar
SFX A erŧéder arŧeda erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaralo/S erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarami/K erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaratu/O erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarave/RT erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaremo/L erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaren/L erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedareni/M erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarense erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaresi/P erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaresiu/Q erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarimo/L erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarion/L erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarioni/M erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarionse erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarisen/L erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedariseni/M erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarisense erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarision/L erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarisioni/M erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarisionse erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarisié/P erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarisiéu/Q erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarison/L erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarisoni/M erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarisonse erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarié/P erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedariéu/Q erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaron/L erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaroni/M erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaronse erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarà/JLNR erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaràe/R erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarè/JL erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarèmi/K erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaré/P erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarémoi/M erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarésimo/L erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarésimoi/M erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaréu/Q erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarí/P erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaría/JLNR erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaríami/K erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaríatu/O erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaríe/JLR erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaríelo/S erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaríemi/K erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarímoi/M erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaríu/Q erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedarò/JL erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedaròmi/K erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧede/IJLR erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedede erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedege erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedeme/H erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedemo/L erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧeden/L erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedendo/E erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedene erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedeni/M erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedense erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedente/ erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedese/I erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedesi erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedesta/I erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedeste/I erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedesti/I erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedesto/I erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedeva/JLPR erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedeve/JL erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedevi/NP erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedevo/JL erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedi/FN erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedime/H erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedimo/L erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedion/L erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedione erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedioni/M erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedionse erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedisen/L erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedisene erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧediseni/M erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedisense erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedision/L erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedisione erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedisioni/M erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedisionse erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedisié/P erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedisiéde/P erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedisiége/P erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedison/L erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedisone erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedisoni/M erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedisonse erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧediven/L erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧediveni/M erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedivense erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedivion/L erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedivioni/M erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedivionse erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedivié/P erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧediviéu/Q erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedivon/L erŧéder
SFX A erŧéder arŧedivoni/M erŧéder
