public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
aerar/A
albeđar/A
aldir/A
alterixar/A
amaredar/A
andonar/A
angosiar/A
inarđentar/A
arđinar/A
dexarmidar/A
artikoƚar/A
ativar/A
asetar/A
autorar/A
inaxenir/A
badaɉar/A
xbagasar/A
xbajar/A
baƚar/A
balansar/A
balkar/A
xbaƚonar/A
xbaƚotar/A
xbalsar/A
bandiđar/A
banketar/A
xbaraɉar/A
barbaɉar/A
dexbarkar/A
basar/A
bàter/A
dexbatidar/A
xbatolar/A
inbaular/A
xbaviđar/A
xbefejar/A
begar/A
xberlotar/A
betegar/A
bevasar/A
xbiankexar/A
biasugar/A
xbiƚansar/A
dexbingoƚar/A
sobisar/A
bituar/A
xboar/A
strabójer/A
bokonar/A
inbonar/A
bordar/A
dexboskar/A
dexboŧar/A
xbragañar/A
inbratar/A
breviar/A
xbrodoƚar/A
inbronkar/A
xbudelar/A
skonbusolar/A
dexbuxoƚar/A
descavar/A
tracèñer/A
ciɉar/A
copar/A
daneđar/A
xderenar/A
dindoƚar/A
dojidar/A
redomandar/A
dormenŧar/A
redreŧar/A
inxalar/A
dèmer/A
xontar/A
đornaliđar/A
durar/A
ekonomiđar/A
entuxiaxmar/A
axaƚar/A
putrefar/A
falir/A
fameɉaridar/A
infasar/A
faveƚar/A
sakrifegar/A
defenestrar/A
festexar/A
infiankir/A
figurar/A
sfiƚasar/A
sfiorir/A
dexafitar/A
desfogonar/A
refónder/A
formaliđar/A
straforŧar/A
frantonar/A
fraterniđar/A
desfregolar/A
infrisar/A
fufiñar/A
funsionar/A
ingaɉar/A
gaƚonar/A
xgangerar/A
garbidar/A
dexgatejar/A
globoƚar/A
gorar/A
gradeƚar/A
ingranfir/A
gravar/A
ingrespar/A
griñar/A
xgrixolir/A
guar/A
xguatarar/A
inibir/A
infilsar/A
inproviđar/A
intriveƚar/A
tranxíjer/A
xjasar/A
inɉermar/A
dexɉoŧar/A
ɉuguƚar/A
skaenar/A
kaƚafatar/A
skalmanar/A
rekalŧitrar/A
skanelar/A
skanpanixar/A
skapar/A
skaprisiar/A
skarkaɉar/A
karpionar/A
inskartosar/A
inkatarigoƚar/A
deskaŧar/A
skavaƚar/A
kietar/A
skojonar/A
kolegar/A
rakomandar/A
kondir/A
konpónder/A
skontrar/A
rekopiar/A
rekordar/A
kornixar/A
kortixar/A
kovar/A
skrekoƚar/A
kritegar/A
krostolidar/A
skuadronar/A
skuèrxer/A
skular/A
inkurvar/A
ƚamentar/A
lañar/A
relasar/A
xlavakiar/A
delegar/A
ƚesar/A
xlexerir/A
xlièder/A
interlinear/A
ƚodar/A
ƚontanar/A
xludrar/A
relúxer/A
xmajar/A
xmanarar/A
maniđar/A
xmarasar/A
xmarteƚar/A
dexmaskarar/A
matrixar/A
mediar/A
xmeđar/A
emendar/A
merkantixar/A
parametriđar/A
aministrar/A
remodernar/A
xmolar/A
amontar/A
morbidir/A
xmorsar/A
inmucarar/A
remurkiar/A
inmuxonar/A
xnaxar/A
nevegar/A
noledar/A
dexnuar/A
xñifar/A
ofiŧiar/A
adonbrar/A
onjar/A
organedar/A
ospitar/A
padir/A
inpakar/A
paƚesar/A
spalpuñar/A
spanpalar/A
papusar/A
desparexar/A
partiŧionar/A
spasiđar/A
patentar/A
inpaurir/A
inpegar/A
speƚakiar/A
spenelar/A
penolar/A
perir/A
repeskar/A
petenar/A
spesegar/A
traxpiantar/A
despiegar/A
pindoƚar/A
despirar/A
inpiŧar/A
aplaudir/A
spolpar/A
despóner/A
ponsar/A
spontiđar/A
konportar/A
inpotegar/A
intraprénder/A
reprexentar/A
despropiar/A
puniar/A
putelar/A
radobar/A
rankar/A
rascar/A
recexar/A
regoƚar/A	po:verb
resitar/A
riscar/A
roar/A
inrokir/A
ronkidar/A
rotamar/A
inrudenir/A
rutar/A
sajar/A
saƚariar/A
resaltar/A
sapunir/A
scafiđar/A
scordir/A
rasekurar/A
seitar/A
deseleđar/A
sentir/A
inserajar/A
sfarŧar/A
siɉilar/A
sinkopar/A
skaɉar/A
skarar/A
skarsixar/A
skinsar/A
skorsar/A
inskríver/A
sojar/A
soleŧitar/A
insonar/A
sorsejar/A
spaƚexar/A
specar/A
ispesionar/A
spirar/A
spoxar/A	po:verb
sotostar/A
starnudir/A
instaurar/A
stilar/A
istisar/A
istradar/A
strejar/A
istromentar/A
istuar/A
subir/A
superbir/A
tabular/A
takar/A
intanbuxar/A
tariđar/A
tastidar/A
intecar/A
intendacar/A
tentar/A
oteñir/A
astéñer/A
termenar/A
tibiar/A
stironar/A
intoƚar/A
tonfar/A
tornir/A
kontòrder/A
detràer/A
trajar/A
intrapolar/A
rintrasar/A
treskar/A
destrigoƚar/A
tronkar/A
intujar/A
insakoƚar/A
ŧavarjar/A
sefar/A
sentraƚixar/A
serkar/A
inŧetar/A
ŧikolar/A
simentar/A
postiŧipar/A
siviƚixar/A
ŧopegar/A
udar/A
urtexar/A
vageđar/A
stravanir/A
varar/A
provéder/A
veƚenar/A
ventar/A
interveñir/A
kontravèñer/A
inverxelar/A
inverigolar/A
inversiar/A
xvetolar/A
viƚir/A
xviñar/A
vixilar/A
invojar/A
xvolaŧar/A
xvoltoƚar/A
traxaƚir/A
xbarlar/A
inxentiƚir/A
raxirar/A
xmincar/A
xufar/A
deskúter/A
regolarixar/A
benedíxer/A
fonsionar/A
obliterar/A
xgrasiar/A
frasar/A
injotir/A
maƚandar/A
repeƚir/A
skaroñar/A
xgarnelar/A
spetenar/A
apokopar/A
